Washington statutes.
RCW 8.25.073

Award of costs in air space corridor acquisitions—Conditions.

A superior court having jurisdiction of a proceeding instituted by a condemnor to acquire an air space corridor together with other property rights shall award the condemnee costs including reasonable attorney fees and reasonable expert witness fees, subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of RCW 8.25.070, if—

(1) there is a final adjudication that the condemnor cannot acquire the air space corridor or other property rights by condemnation; or

(2) the proceeding is abandoned by the condemnor.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 39 s 2.]